Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 432.253 is amended to read:
432.253. (1) If an original record of live birth for a person at least  21 years of age was sealed
under ORS 432.245 and was later opened under ORS 432.228 or 432.250, and the paternity or par-
entage of the person has been determined by DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) testing or by other means,
the person may apply to the Center for Health Statistics to add or change the name of a  biological
parent on the original record of live birth.
(2) An application under this section must include:
(a) Evidence of a DNA test  or other evidence that shows that the person whose name is to be
entered as a biological parent is the biological parent of the applicant; and
(b)(A) If the person whose name is to  be entered as a biological parent is living, an affidavit
attesting that the person is a biological parent of the applicant and that the  name to be entered is
that of the biological parent that was omitted from the original record of live birth; or
(B) If the person whose name is to be entered as a biological parent is deceased, an  affidavit
from the personal representative  or a relative of the person attesting that the person is a biological
parent of  the applicant and that the name to be entered is that of the biological parent that was
omitted from the original record of live birth.
(3) If the name of a biological parent is entered on  an original record of live birth under this
section:
(a) A person may only obtain a noncertified copy of a record of live birth amended  under this
section.
(b) A notation indicating that the record was amended  must be shown on all copies of the re-
cord.
(c) The center shall prominently display the following  language on all copies of the record:
“THIS RECORD OF LIVE BIRTH MAY NOT BE USED FOR ANY LEGAL PURPOSE AND DOES
NOT CREATE ANY LEGAL RIGHTS FOR THE CHILD OR THE  PARENTS LISTED ON THE
RECORD.”
(4) The center shall adopt rules regarding:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-INTRO) Page 1
(a) The establishment and collection of fees for the preparation and registration of  an amended
original record of live birth and for the issuance of a noncertified copy of an  amended original re-
cord of live birth under this section.
(b) Consent and affidavit forms,  proof of identification requirements and the evidentiary re-
quirements to substantiate that a person  is an omitted biological parent of an applicant under this
section.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 432.253 by  section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to ori-
ginal records of live birth opened under ORS 432.228 or 432.250 before,  on or after the effec-
tive date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 13, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-INTRO) Page 2